Mississippi, session 2026, SB2079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A person commits the crime of reckless endangerment when the person recklessly engages in conduct that places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury. (2)  Upon conviction of reckless endangerment, the person shall be fined up to Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), placed in the custody of the county jail for a term of not more than one (1) year, or both fined and imprisoned. (3)  Upon conviction of reckless endangerment committed with a deadly weapon, the person shall be fined up to Three Thousand Dollars ($3000.00), imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than one (1) year and not more than six (6) years, or both fined and imprisoned. (4)  (a)  Upon conviction of reckless endangerment by discharging a firearm or antique firearm into a dwelling house, as defined by Section 97-17-31, that was occupied at the time of the offense, the person shall be fined up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than three (3) years and not more than fifteen (15) years, or both fined and imprisoned. (b)  Upon conviction of reckless endangerment by discharging a firearm or antique firearm into a dwelling house, as defined by Section 97-17-31, that was unoccupied at the time of the offense, the person shall be fined up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2) years and not more than twelve (12) years, or both fined and imprisoned. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.